Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 27. Producers, Agents, Administrators, Brokers, Adjusters, and Managers.

Administrative Code. —

For producers, managing general agents, surplus lines brokers, reinsurance intermediary managers, reinsurance intermediary brokers, third-party administrators, and independent adjusters, see 3 AAC 23.

Collateral references. —

Bertram Harnett, Responsibilities of Insurance Agents and Brokers (Matthew Bender).

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 32 to 34, 108 to 158.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 85 to 90, 178 to 217.

Public regulation or control of insurance agents or brokers, 10 ALR2d 950.

Liability of tortfeasor’s insurance agent or broker to injured party for failure to procure or maintain liability insurance, 72 ALR4th 1095.